Maine, session 132, LD1756.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§82-B is enacted to read:
82-B.
Transportation: Transportation Project Selection Council Not Authorized 23 MRSA
Project §4209-B
Selection
Sec. 2. 23 MRSA §1961, sub-§5, as enacted by IB 1991, c. 1, §3, is amended to
read:
5. Transportation policy. Transportation planning decisions, capital investment
decisions and project decisions of the Maine Turnpike Authority are governed by and must
comply with the transportation policy set forth in section 73 and rules implementing that
policy and must take into consideration the statewide transportation project selection
prioritization process as provided in section 4209-B.
Sec. 3. 23 MRSA §4209-B is enacted to read:
§4209-B. Transportation Project Selection Council
1. Council established. The Transportation Project Selection Council, referred to in
this section as "the council," is established in accordance with Title 5, section 12004-I,
subsection 82-B to develop and manage a statewide transportation project selection
prioritization process, referred to in this section as "the prioritization process." The council
includes, but is not limited to, the following members:
A. The commissioner or the commissioner's designee; and
B. The following individuals appointed by the commissioner:
(1) One representative each from the federally designated planning organizations
for the Bangor, Kittery, Lewiston and Auburn and Portland regions;
(2) One representative representing transportation interests in Aroostook County;
(3) One representative of a statewide association of planning and development
agencies;
(4) One representative of an economic development organization;
(5) One representative of an organization representing persons with low incomes;
(6) One representative of an organization from one of the State's immigrant
communities;
(7) One representative of a statewide environmental organization;
(8) One transportation engineer;
(9) One representative of an organization representing persons with disabilities;
(10) Two representatives of transit agencies, one of whom represents an urban
agency and one of whom represents a rural agency;
(11) One representative of a statewide transportation organization;
(12) One representative of the Maine Turnpike Authority; and
Page 1 - 132LR1653(01)

(13) One representative of organized labor that works on transportation issues in
the State.
In making appointments, the commissioner shall ensure that rural and urban areas are
represented.
2. Terms; vacancies; chair; vice-chair. A member of the council appointed pursuant
to subsection 1, paragraph B serves for a term of 3 years. If a member is unable to complete
the term, the commissioner shall appoint a member from the same category of members
listed in subsection 1, paragraph B as the member who vacated the council to serve out the
unexpired portion of the term. The council shall annually elect a chair and vice-chair from
among its members, each of whom serves a term of one year.
3. Council duties; prioritization process. The council shall:
A. Advise the department and the Maine Turnpike Authority on the development of a
prioritization process for projects administered in accordance with federal
transportation requirements and, in cooperation with municipalities, counties and other
planning organizations within the State, for the use of funds allocated to the department
and the Maine Turnpike Authority. The prioritization process must:
(1) Be used for the development of any plan for a project created by the department
or the Maine Turnpike Authority; and
(2) Take into consideration, at a minimum, highway, transit, rail, roadway, active
transportation and technology operational improvements and transportation
demand management strategies;
B. Prior to the analysis in subsection 4, review transportation projects and strategies
to determine whether projects are consistent with the assessment of capacity needs
outlined in the department's or the Maine Turnpike Authority's long-range
transportation plans;
C. Weigh key goals under subsection 4 for each of the State's federally designated
planning organization regions. For purposes of this paragraph, the council may assign
different weights to each key goal, within each region, based on the unique needs and
characteristics of the region;
D. Solicit input from municipalities, counties and other planning organizations, transit
operators, environmental groups, active transportation groups, economic development
groups and other stakeholders in the development of the prioritization process. The
council shall hold at least 3 public meetings annually for public input on the
prioritization process. The council may hold meetings using an electronic platform,
except that the council must hold at least one meeting annually in person. Public
comment must be accepted by the council prior to the publication of any draft
prioritization process and prior to any final prioritization process; and
E. Make public, in an accessible format updated at least annually, a report with the
results of the review under paragraph B and analysis under subsection 4 of proposed
projects, including how the weight of key goals was applied in accordance with
paragraph C.
4. Prioritization process requirements. The prioritization process must be based on
an objective and quantifiable analysis factoring public input of projects proposed for
Page 2 - 132LR1653(01)

414 funding using the State's key goals listed in long-range transportation plans. Key goals
425 include, but are not limited to:
A. Safe travel with priority on avoiding crashes that cause death or serious injury and
protecting vulnerable users;
B. A well-managed transportation system measured by reliability and system
condition;
C. A vibrant economy and world-class quality of life measured by economic impact
analysis, including the health and vibrancy of the State's downtowns and villages;
D. Environmentally sustainable transportation systems measured by greenhouse gas
emissions from the transportation systems and effects on lands and waters, including,
but not limited to, storm water runoff and heat island effects; and
E. Equitable access measured by consideration of access to jobs and essential services,
particularly for low-income households. Accessibility must be measured using a peer-
reviewed, data-informed tool.
5. Exclusions. The prioritization process may not apply to:
A. Projects in which funding is related to in-kind repair or replacement of existing
traffic control devices or asset management, including, but not limited to, bridge
rehabilitation, bridge-only bridge replacement projects, pavement repair or
replacement and guardrail repair or replacement; and
B. Projects that replace bicycle and pedestrian facilities, including, but not limited to,
sidewalks, shared-use paths or bicycle lanes. Projects under this paragraph must have
their designs upgraded from substandard to standard unless other funds are leveraged
for the bicycle and pedestrian components.
6. Report. The council shall report on the prioritization process, including a list of all
scores and rankings and include the required report under section 3, paragraph E by January
15th of each year to the Governor and the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over transportation matters.
Sec. 4. Selection of projects. Beginning July 1, 2026, the Transportation Project
Selection Council, established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 12004-I,
subsection 82-B shall select projects for funding pursuant to the statewide transportation
project selection prioritization process under Title 23, section 4209-B.
Sec. 5. Staggered terms. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 23,
section 4209-B, subsection 2, members initially appointed by the Commissioner of
Transportation to the Transportation Project Selection Council pursuant to this Act are
appointed to staggered terms, with 4 members appointed for 2-year terms, 5 members
appointed for 3-year terms and 5 members appointed for 4-year terms.